District of Columbia statutes.
25-118

Tasting permit requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A tasting permit shall be issued only to a licensee under a manufacturer’s license, class A or B, or a retailer’s license, class A or B, to utilize a portion of its licensed premises for the tasting of products as listed in subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

Containers of alcoholic beverages used for sampling purposes shall be labeled as such and may not be sold.

(c)

A licensee shall not provide to a customer, in one day, samples greater than the following quantities:

(1)

3 ounces of spirits;

(2)

6 ounces of wines; and

(3)

12 ounces of beer.

(d)

A tasting permit shall be valid for 3 years.

(e)

The holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A, may utilize a portion of the licensed premises for the sampling of wine and spirits, and the holder of a manufacturer’s license, class B, may utilize a portion of the licensed premises for the sampling of beer, between the hours of 1:00 p.m. and 9:00 p.m., 7 days a week.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(d), 51 DCR 6525
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 2(e), 55 DCR 6289
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-25, § 2, 58 DCR 6513
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2112(b), 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-82, § 2, 61 DCR 175
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(a)(6), 62 DCR 1866

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (a), substituted “class A, or an applicant which is a full service grocery store and meets the requirements of § 25-303(c)(1), (2), and (3)” for “class A”; and added subsec. (d).
D.C. Law 17-201, in subsec. (a), substituted “class A and B” for “class A”; and, in subsec. (d), substituted “3 years” for “2 years”.
D.C. Law 19-25, in subsec. (a), substituted “manufacturer’s license, class B, a retailer’s license, class A and B, or an applicant” for “retailer’s license, class A and B, or an applicant”; and added subsec. (e).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “class A and B” for “class B” following “manufacturer’s license” in (a); and in (e), added “The holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A, may utilize a portion of the licensed premises for the sampling of spirits, and” and added the comma following “sampling of beer.”
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-82 substituted “7 days a week” for “Thursday through Saturday” in (e).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (a); and substituted “of wine and spirits” for “of spirits” in (e).

Temporary Legislation

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-17, in subsec. (a), substituted “manufacturer’s license, class B; retailer’s license, class A and B; or an applicant” for “retailer’s license, class A and B, or an applicant”; and added subsec. (e) to read as follows:
“(e) The holder of a manufacturer’s license, class B, may utilize a portion of the licensed premises for the sampling of alcoholic beverages between the hours of 1:00 p.m. and 9:00 p.m., Thursday through Saturday.”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-17 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Brewery Manufacturer’s Tasting Permit Amendment Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-71, May 19, 2011, 58 DCR 4235).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Brewery Manufacturer’s Tasting Permit Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-148, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6830).